District of Columbia statutes.
27-102

Liability and damages.

(a)

Anyone who commits an offense of fraud, shoplifting, or theft from a merchant shall be civilly liable to the merchant for treble the amount of actual damages; and

(1)

The retail value of any goods or merchandise stolen if the goods or merchandise are not recovered;

(2)

The loss of value of the goods or merchandise stolen if the goods or merchandise are recovered; or

(3)

A minimum of $50 in damages, whichever is greater.

(b)

The parent or guardian shall be liable for any acts or offenses committed by a juvenile under this subchapter.

History

May 16, 1992, D.C. Law 9-98, § 3, 39 DCR 678

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-442.

Temporary Addition of Section

See note to § 27-101.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see §§ 2-7 of the Merchant’s Civil Recovery for Criminal Conduct Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-110, November 25, 1991, 38 DCR 7304).
For temporary addition of chapter, see §§ 2-7 of the Merchant’s Civil Recovery for Criminal Conduct Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-155, February 21, 1992, 39 DCR 1354).

Editor's Notes

Because of the codification of D.C. Law 20-34 as subchapter II of this chapter, and the designation of the preexisting text of Chapter 1 as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter”, where applicable, in this section.